Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.240

Fraudulent names—Record of.

The officer making the canvass of a recall petition shall keep a record of all names appearing on it that are not certified to be legal voters of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, and of all names appearing more than once, and shall report the same to the prosecuting attorneys of the respective counties where the names appear to have been signed, to the end that prosecutions may be had for the violation of this chapter.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1420; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.120. Prior: 1913 c 146 s 10; RRS s 5359. Formerly RCW 29.82.120.]